Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4105
Office of Public Guardian; duties.

The office:

(1) Shall provide
immediate response when a guardian or conservator is needed in an emergency
situation;

(2) Shall provide an option upon the resignation, removal, or discharge
of a guardian or conservator so that there is no lapse in service to the ward
or protected person;

(3) Shall provide equal access and protection for all individuals
in need of guardianship or conservatorship services;

(4) Shall promote or provide
public education to increase the awareness of the duties of guardians and
conservators and encourage more people to serve as private guardians or private
conservators;

(5) Shall recruit members of the general public or family members
to serve as guardians or conservators and provide adequate training and support
to enhance their success;

(6) Shall act as a resource to persons already serving as guardians
or conservators for education, information, and support;

(7) Shall safeguard
the rights of individuals by exploring all options available to support individuals
in the least restrictive manner possible and seek full guardianship only as
a last resort; and

(8) Shall model the highest standard of practice for guardians and
conservators to improve the performance of all guardians and conservators
in the state.

Laws 2014, LB920, § 5.